Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-2809
County board of corrections; contracts authorized.

The county board of corrections may, pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act or Joint Public Agency Act, contract with any governmental unit for the purposes of implementing and complying with this section and sections 23-1703, 23-2801 to 23-2803, 23-2805, and 23-2806 and may contract with any individual, firm, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation to provide goods or services essential to the operation and maintenance of the county jail.

Laws 1979, LB 396, § 7;

Laws 1984, LB 394, § 7;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 163;

Laws 1999, LB 87, § 66.

Interlocal Cooperation Act, see section 13-801.

Joint Public Agency Act, see section 13-2501.